apertium-deu-nld.nld.dix
    <pardef n="beduid/en__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>den</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>den</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>den</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="v/inden__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ind</l>
          <r>inden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>indt</l>
          <r>inden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>indt</l>
          <r>inden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inden</l>
          <r>inden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inden</l>
          <r>inden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inden</l>
          <r>inden<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ond</l>
          <r>inden<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ond</l>
          <r>inden<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ond</l>
          <r>inden<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onden</l>
          <r>inden<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onden</l>
          <r>inden<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onden</l>
          <r>inden<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="verkla/ren__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>ren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>art</l>
          <r>ren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>art</l>
          <r>ren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ren</l>
          <r>ren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ren</l>
          <r>ren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ren</l>
          <r>ren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arde</l>
          <r>ren<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arde</l>
          <r>ren<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arde</l>
          <r>ren<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arden</l>
          <r>ren<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arden</l>
          <r>ren<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arden</l>
          <r>ren<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="v/allen__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>al</l>
          <r>allen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alt</l>
          <r>allen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alt</l>
          <r>allen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>allen</l>
          <r>allen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>allen</l>
          <r>allen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>allen</l>
          <r>allen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iel</l>
          <r>allen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iel</l>
          <r>allen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iel</l>
          <r>allen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ielen</l>
          <r>allen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ielen</l>
          <r>allen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ielen</l>
          <r>allen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="beduiden"><i>beduid</i><par n="beduid/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vallen"><i>v</i><par n="v/allen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="verklaren"><i>verkla</i><par n="verkla/ren__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vinden"><i>v</i><par n="v/inden__vblex"/></e>
